Utah statutes.
4-31-1.   Outbreak of contagious or infectious disease -- Assistance of federal authorities.

If there is an outbreak of contagious or infectious disease among domestic animals in this state that imperils livestock in adjoining states, the commissioner shall seek the assistance of the United States Animal, Plant and Health Inspection Service in preventing the spread of the disease to other states.

